California, session 20252026, SB437.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 4.8 (commencing with Section 8308) is added to Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to read: CHAPTER 4.8. Claim Eligibility Based on Genealogy and Descendancy8308. (a) Up to six million dollars ($6,000,000) of the funds provided for this purpose in Item 6610-001-0001 of the Budget Act of 2025 may be used for the purpose of enabling the California State University to conduct research in furtherance of the recommendations of the Task Force to Study and Develop Reparation Proposals for African Americans, with a Special Consideration for African Americans Who are Descendants of Persons Enslaved in the United States as established under former Section 8301.1, added by Section 1 of Chapter 319 of the Statutes of 2020. The California State University may partner with other universities or nonprofit institutions in furtherance of this section.(b) The California State University shall explore options to determine how to confirm an individual’s status as a descendant of an enslaved person. The California State University shall also establish a process for conducting or verifying genealogical research for the purpose of confirming an individual’s status as a descendant of an enslaved person for eligibility for reparative claims on or before the start of the 2029–30 academic year and commence the work of establishing the process on or before the start of the 2026–27 academic year. Funding from subdivision (a) may be used to support student participation in support of this goal.(c) Before the start of each fiscal year, the California State University shall consult with the California Legislative Black Caucus to propose a list of research components to be addressed through the appropriation in subdivision (a) and each year until funding is exhausted.(d) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5, the California State University shall, on or before October 1 of each year and until funding from subdivision (a) is exhausted, submit to the Legislature and Governor a report with a status update of pending research projects, and any research projects that have been completed within the prior year. The final report shall include research findings, recommendations with options, and timelines for statewide implementation, including costs, developed pursuant to this section.(2) A report submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795.(e) For purposes of this section, “descendant of an enslaved person” means an individual who can establish direct lineage to a person who, before 1900, was subjected to American chattel slavery and meets at least one of the following criteria:(1) Was emancipated through legal or extralegal means, including self-purchase, manumission, legislative action, military service, or judicial ruling.(2) Obtained freedom through gradual abolition statutes or constitutional amendments.(3) Was classified as a fugitive from bondage under federal or state law.(4) Was deemed contraband by military authorities.(5) Rendered military or civic service while subject to legal restrictions based on ancestry historically associated with slavery.